Wyoming, session 2025, HB0080.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-4-722 is created to read:

9-4-722. Investment of state funds; consideration of
only financial purposes.
HB0080

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0323

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Fiduciary" means as defined by W.S.
9-3-434(a)(xi) and includes any investment trustee, manager
or other person responsible for making investment decisions
or investment policies concerning state funds;

(ii) "Fiduciary commitment" means any evidence
of a fiduciary's or trustee's purpose in managing the
investment of state funds, including but not limited to:

(A) Advertising, statements, explanations,
reports, letters to clients, communications with portfolio
companies, statements of principles or commitments; or

(B) Participation in, affiliation with or
status as a signatory to any coalition, initiative, joint
statement of principles or agreement.

(iii) "Financial" means having been prudently
determined by a fiduciary or trustee to have a material
effect on the financial risk or the financial return of an
HB0080

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0323
investment. "Financial" shall not include any action taken,
or factor considered, by a fiduciary or trustee with any
purpose whatsoever to further social, political or
ideological interests. A fiduciary may reasonably be
determined to have taken an action, or considered a factor,
with a purpose to further social, political or ideological
interests based upon evidence showing a fiduciary
commitment to further, through portfolio company
engagement, board or shareholder votes or other actions as
a fiduciary or a trustee, any of the following actions
beyond what state or federal law requires:

(A) Eliminating, reducing, offsetting or
disclosing greenhouse gas emissions;

(B) Instituting or assessing corporate
board or employment, composition, compensation or
disclosure criteria that incorporates characteristics
protected in this state as specified in W.S.
27-9-105(a)(i);

(C) Divesting from, limiting investment in
or limiting the activities or investments of any company
HB0080

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0323
for failing or not committing to meet environmental
standards or disclosures;

(D) Providing or increasing access to
abortion, sex or gender changes, transgender surgery or any
treatment or procedure that would violate W.S.
35-4-1001(b);

(E) Divesting from, limiting investment in
or limiting the activities of any company that engages in,
facilitates or supports the manufacture, import,
distribution, marketing, advertising, sale or lawful use of
firearms, ammunition, components, parts or accessories of
firearms or ammunition.

(iv) "Investment entity" means the state
treasurer, the state loan and investment board, the Wyoming
retirement board, the Wyoming retirement system and any
other entity responsible for the investment or management
of the investment of state funds;

(v) "State funds" means permanent funds as
defined by W.S. 9-4-714(a)(v), the retirement account
HB0080

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0323
established in W.S. 9-3-407(a), any other funds invested by
the Wyoming retirement system and any other funds invested
by the state treasurer.

(b) In making and supervising investments of state
funds, each investment entity shall discharge its
investment duties solely in the financial interest of the
beneficiaries of the applicable state funds for the
exclusive purposes of:

(i) Providing financial benefits to the
beneficiaries of the state funds;

(ii) Defraying reasonable expenses of
administering the investment of state funds;

(iii) Meeting other purposes required by law and
not relating to the actions and considerations prohibited
by this section.

(c) Any person or fiduciary designated as a custodian
of any state funds and any person or fiduciary retained to
HB0080

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0323
invest state funds shall be subject to the same fiduciary
duties as an investment entity has under this section.

(d) Each fiduciary shall take into account only
financial factors when discharging its duties in investing
state funds.

(e) All shares of stock held directly or indirectly
by or on behalf of an investment entity or on behalf of the
investment entity's beneficiaries shall be voted solely in
the financial interest of the beneficiaries.

(f) Unless no economically practicable alternative is
available:

(i) The investment entity shall not grant proxy
voting authority to any person who is not part of the
investment entity or who is not employed by the investment
entity, except that the investment entity may grant proxy
voting authority to a person who has a practice of, and
commits in writing to, follow guidelines that match the
investment entity's obligation to act solely upon financial
factors as required by this section;
HB0080

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0323

(ii) State funds shall not be entrusted to a
fiduciary unless the fiduciary has a practice of, and
commits in writing to, follow guidelines when engaging with
portfolio companies and voting shares or proxies that match
the investment entity's obligation to act solely upon
financial factors as required by this section;

(iii) No fiduciary shall adopt a practice of
following the recommendations of a proxy advisor or other
service provider unless the advisor or service provider has
a practice of, and commits in writing to, following proxy
voting guidelines that match the investment entity's
obligation to act solely upon financial factors as required
by this section.

(g) All proxy votes shall be tabulated and reported
annually by the investment entity not later than September
1 of each year. For each vote, the report shall contain a
vote caption, the plan's vote, the recommendation of
company management and, if applicable, the proxy advisor's
recommendation. Each report prepared under this subsection
shall be posted on the investment entity's website.
HB0080

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0323

(h) The attorney general may enforce any violation of
this section. If the attorney general believes that a
person has engaged in or is engaging in a violation of this
section, the attorney general may require the person to
file a statement or report in writing, under oath, as to
all of the facts and circumstances concerning the violation
and to provide any other data and information deemed
necessary.

(j) In addition to any other remedies available at
law or equity, any person who serves as a fiduciary and who
violates this section shall be liable for damages to the
investment entity in an amount equal to three (3) times the
amount paid to the person by the board for the person's
services. All amounts collected under this subsection shall
be deposited into the applicable state fund against which
the violation was committed.

Section 2. W.S. 9-3-405(a)(v), 9-3-408(b)(intro),
9-3-436(a), 9-3-440(a)(intro) and (b), 9-4-715(a)(intro)
and (b) and 9-4-716(a)(intro) are amended to read:

HB0080

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0323
9-3-405. Retirement board duties and powers.

(a) In addition to any other duties prescribed by
law, the board shall:

(v) Serve as investment trustee of the funds of
the system. In serving as investment trustee under this
paragraph, the board shall comply with the requirements of
W.S. 9-4-722;

9-3-408. Designated custodian of retirement account;
disbursements; investment of account monies.

(b) The board, or its designee, which shall be
registered under the Investment Advisor's Act of 1940 as
amended, or any bank as defined in that act, upon written
authority, shall invest monies in the retirement account,
which investments shall not be considered disbursements for
the purposes of W.S. 9-4-214 and subsection (a) of this
section. In investing and managing monies in the retirement
account and subject to the requirements of W.S. 9-4-722,
the board, or its designee, shall exercise the judgment and
care that a prudent investor would, in light of the
HB0080

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0323
purposes, terms, distribution requirements and all other
circumstances surrounding the monies in the retirement
account, including risk and return objectives established
by the board which are reasonably suitable to the purpose
of the Wyoming retirement system.

9-3-436. Establishment of trust.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of
this section, all assets of a retirement system are held in
trust for the exclusive benefit of the members, retirees
and beneficiaries of the system, including reasonable
administrative expenses. The trustee has the exclusive
authority, subject to this act, to invest and manage those
assets, subject to the requirements of W.S. 9-4-722.

9-3-440. Duties of trustee in investing and managing
assets of retirement system.

(a) In investing and managing assets of a retirement
system pursuant to W.S. 9-3-439 and subject to W.S.
9-4-722, a trustee with authority to invest and manage
assets:
HB0080

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0323

(b) A trustee with authority to invest and manage
assets of a retirement system shall adopt a statement of
investment objectives and policies for each retirement
program or appropriate grouping of programs, subject to the
requirements of W.S. 9-4-722. The statement shall include
the desired rate of return on assets overall, the desired
rates of return and acceptable levels of risk for each
asset class, asset-allocation goals, guidelines for the
delegation of authority and information on the types of
reports to be used to evaluate investment performance. At
least annually, the trustee shall review the statement and
change or reaffirm it.

9-4-715. Permissible investments.

(a) The state treasurer, in consultation with the
investment funds committee, shall employ a designated chief
investment officer who shall have minimum qualifications
including at least ten (10) years of experience managing
institutional investment portfolios of in excess of five
hundred million dollars ($500,000,000.00), experience with
hiring and managing internal and external investment
HB0080

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0323
managers and extensive experience in any two (2) or more of
the following areas: domestic equity, fixed income
securities, international equity or alternative
investments. The designated chief investment officer shall
provide the state treasurer with information and
recommendations regarding the investment of state funds and
additional information as requested by the state treasurer.
The state treasurer shall compile an annual report which
shall include investment, income, individual and aggregate
gains and losses by fund and the extent to which the state
investment policy is being implemented. Subject to
requirements of W.S. 9-4-722 and subsection (c) of this
section, state funds may be invested in any investment:

(b) The state treasurer, or his designee, which shall
be registered under the Investment Advisor's Act of 1940 as
amended if required to be registered by the terms of that
act as amended, may invest the permanent funds in equities,
including stocks of corporations in accordance with
subsections (a) through (e) of this section, and W.S.
9-4-716 and 9-4-722. The state treasurer shall report at
least annually to the select committee on capital financing
and investments, the joint appropriations committee and the
HB0080

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0323
investment funds committee on the analysis conducted
pursuant to paragraph (d)(ii) of this section and W.S.
9-4-716(b)(ix) and (e).

9-4-716. State investment policy; investment
consultant.

(a) The board, in consultation with the investment
funds committee, shall adopt investment policy statements
for state funds and shall review those policy statements at
least annually. These policy statements shall be subject to
W.S. 9-4-722 and to the following:

Section 3. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
impair or otherwise modify any contract entered into before
July 1, 2025.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0080